District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.83

Chapter not applied retroactively.

This chapter shall not apply with respect to any accident, or judgment arising therefrom, or violation of the motor vehicle laws of the District of Columbia, occurring prior to May 25, 1955.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 140, ch. 222, § 83
1981 Ed., § 40-480.
1973 Ed., § 40-496.